Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.195

Pricing information to be given—Billing "cash advanced" items.

(1) Every licensed funeral director, his or her agent, or his or her employee shall give, or cause to be given, to the person making funeral arrangements or arranging for shipment, transportation, or other disposition of a deceased person:

(a) If requested by voice, data, text, electronic, or other similar transmission, accurate information regarding the retail prices of funeral merchandise and services offered for sale by that funeral director; and

(b) At the time such arrangements are completed or prior to the time of rendering the service, a written, itemized statement showing to the extent then known the price of merchandise and service that such person making such arrangements has selected, the price of supplemental items of service and merchandise, if any, and the estimated amount of each item for which the funeral service firm will advance money as an accommodation to the person making such funeral arrangements.

(2) No such funeral director, his or her agent, or his or her employee, shall bill or cause to be billed any item that is referred to as a "cash advanced" item unless the net amount paid for such item by the funeral director is the same amount as is billed to such funeral director.

[ 2005 c 365 s 16; 1979 ex.s. c 62 s 1.]